West Virginia, session 2026, HB5181.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: §16B-13-12. Moratorium; certificate of need. [Repealed.] NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to eliminate the Certificate of Need Mortarium on opioid treatment programs.Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home